Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 10 Fences

34-10-1.
Lawful fences defined.

The following fences shall be adjudged to be lawful fences:

A hedge with a ditch shall be three feet (3´) high upon the bank of the ditch, well staked, at the distance of two feet and a half (21/2´), bound together at the top and sufficiently filled to prevent small stock from creeping through; and the bank of the ditch shall not be less than one foot (1´) above the surface of the ground.

A hedge without a ditch shall be four feet (4´) high, staked, bound and filled, as a hedge with a ditch.

A post-and-rail fence on the bank of a ditch shall be four (4) rails high, each well set in posts, and not less than four feet and a half (41/2´) high.

A stone wall fence shall be four feet (4´) high, with a flat stone hanging over the top thereof or a good rail or pole thereon, well staked or secured with crotches or posts.

A stone wall without flat stones, rails or posts on the top, shall be four feet and a half (41/2´) high.

A woven wire fence of wire not less than number nine, firmly fastened to posts not more than sixteen feet (16´) apart, constructed of not less than eleven (11) horizontal wires, the top wire not less than fifty-four inches (54") from the ground, the bottom wire not more than two inches (2") from the ground and with stays or uprights not more than six inches (6") apart.

All other kinds of fences not herein particularly described shall be four feet and a half (41/2´) high.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 126, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 152, § 1; P.L. 1916, ch. 1386, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 182, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 645, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-10-1

.

34-10-2.
Consent of adjoining owner to barbed-wire fence.

No fence shall be constructed wholly or in part of barbed wire, as a line fence between adjoining owners, without the consent in writing of the adjoining owners.

History of Section.

P.L. 1906, ch. 1364, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 152, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 182, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 645, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

34-10-2

.

34-10-3.
Removal of barbed-wire fence.

Any adjoining owner who shall not have given his or her consent as provided in §

34-10-2

may complain of the fence to any fence viewer of the town where the fence is located, and may advance to the fence viewer the reasonable expense necessary to remove and store the fence. It shall then be the duty of the fence viewer to notify in writing the other adjoining owner to forthwith remove the fence. If the fence shall not be removed within fifteen (15) days after the giving of the notice, then it shall be the duty of the fence viewer to remove the fence and to store the materials removed. He or she shall deliver the fence materials removed to the owner upon demand.

History of Section.

P.L. 1906, ch. 1364, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 152, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 182, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 645, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

34-10-3

.

34-10-4.
Expense of removal of barbed-wire fence.

The fence viewer or the adjoining owner who has advanced the necessary expense to remove and store the fence may recover all of the expense in an action of debt from the person or persons who caused or suffered the fence to be built.

History of Section.

P.L. 1906, ch. 1364, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 152, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 182, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 645, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

34-10-4

.

34-10-5.
Barbed-wire fences through woodland — Fences existing before 1906.

The provisions of §§

34-10-2

—

34-10-4

shall not apply to line fences running through woodland nor to barbed-wire fences constructed before April 20, 1906.

History of Section.

P.L. 1906, ch. 1364, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 152, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 182, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 645, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

34-10-5

.

34-10-6.
Maintenance of water fences.

Coterminous owners or possessors of land adjoining water, whenever their land is under improvement, shall make and maintain a sufficient water fence to prevent trespass by cattle in the same manner as other partition fences are directed to be made by this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 126, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 152, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 182, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 645, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

34-10-6

.

34-10-7.
Marshland exempt.

All tracts of marshland so situated and exposed to the flow and wash of the sea as to render it impracticable for the several owners thereof to keep up partition fences around the respective shares or lots, shall be exempted from the operation of this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 126, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 152, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 182, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 645, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

34-10-7

.

34-10-8.
Remedies of marshland owner to trespass.

If any person shall permit any cattle, sheep, horses or hogs, to him or her belonging, to run upon any tract of marshland, the owner of the marshland shall, for every trespass, have all the remedies provided in other cases by chapter 14 of title 4.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 126, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 152, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 182, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 645, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

34-10-8

.

34-10-9.
Placement of partition fences — Maintenance throughout year.

All partition fences shall run on the dividing line, and the owners shall have the right to place one-half (1/2) of the width thereof on the land of each adjoining proprietor. The fences shall be kept up and maintained in good order through the year, unless the parties concerned shall otherwise agree.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 126, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 152, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 182, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 645, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

34-10-9

.

34-10-10.
Partition fences between lands under improvement.

Partition fences between lands under improvement shall be made and maintained in equal halves in length and quality, by the proprietors or possessors of those lands respectively.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 126, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 152, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 182, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 645, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

34-10-10

.

34-10-11.
Partition fences between improved and unimproved lands.

In case any proprietor of land shall improve his or her land, the land adjoining being unimproved, and shall make the whole partition fence, the proprietor or possessor of the land adjoining and unimproved shall, upon improvement thereof, pay for one-half (1/2) of the partition fence, according to the value thereof at that time, and shall keep up and maintain the same ever afterwards, whether he or she shall continue to improve the land or not.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 126, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 152, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 182, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 645, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

34-10-11

.

34-10-12.
Payment for previously constructed fence.

Whenever the whole or more than one-half (1/2) of any partition fence shall have been made by the proprietor or possessor of the land on one side of the fence, the proprietor or possessor of the land adjoining, when he or she improves the land, shall pay to the proprietor or possessor who made the fence the value of so much of the fence erected as the fence may exceed one-half (1/2) of the fence on the whole line; and in case of his or her refusal so to do, the value shall be ascertained by any fence viewer of the town where the land is situated, on application to him or her for that purpose.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 126, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 152, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 182, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 645, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

34-10-12

.

34-10-13.
Viewing and division of fence — Award of cost.

The fence viewer, on an application, shall cite the parties in interest on the dividing line, at a convenient time, to view the fence; shall ascertain the value of the whole, and award the one-half (1/2) of the sum against the proprietor or possessor so refusing, with costs, and divide the whole fence between the parties, and make report into the office of the town clerk, which division shall be permanent; and if any person against whom report shall be made as aforesaid shall refuse to pay the sum so reported, the sum, with costs, shall be recovered by the party aggrieved, against that person, by action of debt.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 126, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 152, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 182, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 645, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

34-10-13

.

34-10-14.
Holding and improving partition fences — Agreements between owners.

In all cases where partition fences are erected as one-half (1/2) of the partition fence between proprietors or possessors of adjoining lands, or where the fence may be hereafter erected by the agreement of the parties in interest or other lawful manner, the proprietors of the fences in either of the cases erected, their heirs, successors, or assigns, shall hold and improve the fences without molestation; and shall be forever afterwards excused from making other fence on such dividing line in all cases whatever, except by the special agreement of the parties to the contrary; and all agreements which shall be made relating to the partition fences shall be registered in the office of the town clerk in the town where such lands shall lie.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 126, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 152, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 182, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 645, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

34-10-14

.

34-10-15.
Complaint of neglect to maintain fence.

Whenever any proprietor, possessor or owner of land shall neglect or refuse to repair, build, or rebuild any partition fence or shall withdraw his or her fence from any division line, the aggrieved party may complain to any fence viewer of the town, who, after ten (10) days’ notice to the proprietor, possessor, or owner, shall attend and view the same; the notice, if the address of the owner is not known to the fence viewer, to be given by posting up the same in three (3) or more public places in the town where the lands lie, and if he or she shall find the complaint to be true, he or she shall in writing order the delinquent party to repair, build, or rebuild the same within such time as he or she shall therein appoint, not exceeding fifteen (15) days, and shall lodge a copy of the order in the office of the town clerk of the town in which the land is situated.

Whenever any vegetation overgrows and damages a partition fence, the proprietor, possessor or owner of the land from which the vegetation originates shall be liable for the removal of all of the overgrown vegetation and the necessary repairs to the partition fence caused by the overgrown vegetation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 126, § 5; P.L. 1902, ch. 992, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 152, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 182, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 645, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

34-10-15

; P.L. 2007, ch. 373, § 1.

Section Requirements.

In order for the fence viewer to order a person to build or repair a fence or pay damages for his failure or neglect to do so, there must be a complaint filed charging his neglect. Franklin v. Wells,

6 R.I. 422

,

1860 R.I. LEXIS 7

(1860).

34-10-16.
Construction or repair of fence by complainant — Action for cost and penalties.

If the order shall not be complied with the complainant may build, repair, or rebuild the fence in the manner set forth in the order, and when the fence shall be completed to the satisfaction of such fence viewer he or she shall ascertain the cost thereof and give a certificate of the same, including also his or her fees, to the complainant, who shall be entitled to demand and recover of the party delinquent double the sum in the certificate mentioned, and interest at the rate of twelve per cent (12%) per annum. The fence viewer shall lodge a like certificate, to be signed by him or her, in the town clerk’s office of the town in which the land lies, and the double sum above-mentioned shall be a lien on the land of the delinquent party, and shall attach at and from the time of the filing of the order in the town clerk’s office, as provided in §

34-10-15

, and may be recovered in a civil action. If the defendant cannot be found within the state, the writ shall be served by leaving an attested copy thereof in the clerk’s office of the town wherein the land is situated, and the judgment in the action may be satisfied by an execution issued thereon, levied and served in the same manner as provided for the levy and service of executions in actions at law.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 126, § 6; P.L. 1902, ch. 992, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 152, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 182, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 645, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

34-10-16

.

34-10-17.
Settlement of controversies by viewer.

Whenever any controversy or dispute shall arise about the rights of the respective occupants or owners in division lines or partition fences and their obligations to maintain the same, either party may apply to a fence viewer of the town where the lands lie, who, after ten-days’ notice to each party, to be given as provided in §

34-10-15

, may in writing determine the division line and assign to each his or her part of the partition fence, and direct the time within which each party shall erect, build, or repair his or her part of the fence, which line and assignment being recorded in the office of the town clerk, shall be binding on the parties and all succeeding owners and occupants of the lands, and they shall always thereafter maintain their respective parts of the fence, until the rights of the respective parties shall be differently determined in some proper action.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 126, § 8; P.L. 1902, ch. 992, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 152, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 182, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 645, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

34-10-17

.

34-10-18.
Viewer’s fees.

Every fence viewer shall be allowed six dollars ($6.00) per day for viewing any fence on complaint made to him or her for that purpose, which fees shall be paid in the first instance by the person complaining to him or her; and in case there shall appear to be good cause of complaint, may be by him or her recovered back of the person complained against.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 126, § 13; G.L. 1909, ch. 152, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 182, § 17; P.L. 1923, ch. 469, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 645, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

34-10-18

.

34-10-19.
Neglect of duty by viewer.

If any fence viewer, to whom complaint shall be made against any person for a violation of any of the provisions imposed on him or her by this chapter, shall neglect or refuse to do the duty enjoined on him or her to do, the fence viewer so refusing shall forfeit five dollars ($5.00) for every instance of neglect, to be recovered by any person who shall sue for instances of neglect in the town where the fence viewer shall live.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 126, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 152, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 182, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 645, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

34-10-19

.

34-10-20.
Spite fences.

A fence or other structure in the nature of a fence which unnecessarily exceeds six feet (6´) in height and is maliciously erected or maintained for the purpose of annoying the owners or occupants of adjoining property, shall be deemed a private nuisance, and any owner or occupant who is injured, either in the comfort or enjoyment of his or her estate thereby, may have an action to recover damages for the injury.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 126, § 16, as enacted by P.L. 1909, ch. 416, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 182, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 645, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

34-10-20

.